Utah statutes.
7-16a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Automated teller machine" means an electronic information processing device that:

(a)  is readily accessible to the general public; and

(b)  on behalf of an issuer:

(i)  dispenses currency or coin; or

(ii)  accepts deposits or payments.

(2)  "Customer" means a user of a device for access.

(3)  "Device for access" means a card, code, or other means of access to a customer's account, or any combination of these, that may be used to deposit or withdraw cash through an automated teller machine.

(4)  "Electronic information processing device" means equipment activated by a device for access that transmits electronic impulses to a depository institution on a real-time or delayed-time basis.

(5)  "Issuer" means:

(a)  a depository institution that issues a device for access, whether or not the depository institution is an operator; or

(b)  a state or federal governmental agency that issues a device for access that allows a person to receive benefits from or through the state or federal governmental agency.

(6)  "Point-of-sale terminal" means an electronic information processing device controlled by or accessible to a merchant or other provider of goods or services that authorizes:

(a)  in payment for goods or services, a debit or credit to a customer's account at:

(i)  a depository institution; or

(ii)  a state or federal governmental agency; and

(b)  the merchant or other provider of goods or services to dispense currency or coin to a customer.

(7)  "Operator" means an institution that:

(a) (i)  is a depository institution;

(ii)  is a depository institution holding company; or

(iii)  is an institution directly or indirectly owned or controlled by one or more depository institutions or depository institution holding companies; and

(b)  owns or contracts with an owner of an automated teller machine to operate the automated teller machine.

